Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Chapter 38. The Regulation of Marijuana.
Sec. 17.38.200.
Marijuana establishment registrations.

Each application or renewal application for a registration to operate a marijuana establishment shall be submitted to the board. A renewal application may be submitted up to 90 days before the expiration of the marijuana establishment’s registration. When filing an application for a new registration under this subsection, the applicant shall submit the applicant’s fingerprints and the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check. When filing an application for renewal of registration, an applicant shall submit the applicant’s fingerprints and the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check every five years. The board shall forward the fingerprints and fees to the Department of Public Safety to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

.

The board shall begin accepting and processing applications to operate marijuana establishments one year after February 24, 2015.

Upon receiving an application or renewal application for a marijuana establishment, the board shall immediately forward a copy of each application and half of the registration application fee to the local regulatory authority for the local government in which the applicant desires to operate the marijuana establishment, unless the local government has not designated a local regulatory authority pursuant to AS

17.38.210(c)

.

Within 45 to 90 days after receiving an application or renewal application, the board shall issue an annual registration to the applicant unless the board finds the applicant is not in compliance with regulations enacted pursuant to AS

17.38.190

or the board is notified by the relevant local government that the applicant is not in compliance with ordinances and regulations made pursuant to AS

17.38.210

and in effect at the time of application.

If a local government has enacted a numerical limit on the number of marijuana establishments and a greater number of applicants seek registrations, the board shall solicit and consider input from the local regulatory authority as to the local government’s preference or preferences for registration.

Upon denial of an application, the board shall notify the applicant in writing of the specific reason for its denial.

Every marijuana establishment registration shall specify the location where the marijuana establishment will operate. A separate registration shall be required for each location at which a marijuana establishment operates.

Marijuana establishments and the books and records maintained and created by marijuana establishments are subject to inspection by the board.

A marijuana establishment may not be registered under this chapter if a person who is an owner, officer, or agent of the marijuana establishment has been convicted of a felony and either

less than five years have elapsed from the time of the person’s conviction; or

the person is currently on probation or parole for that felony.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am § 4 ch 4 SLA 2015; am § 15 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as
AS 17.38.100; renumbered in 2015, at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes, and “February 24, 2015” was substituted for “the effective date of this Act”.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 5, 2015, added (i).

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in (a), added the third and fourth sentences, and made a stylistic change.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, in (a), in the third sentence, inserted “for a new registration” following “When filing an application”, added the fourth sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.210.
Local control.

A local government may prohibit the operation of marijuana cultivation facilities, marijuana product manufacturing facilities, marijuana testing facilities, or retail marijuana stores through the enactment of an ordinance or by a voter initiative. An established village may prohibit the operation of marijuana cultivation facilities, marijuana product manufacturing facilities, marijuana testing facilities, or retail marijuana stores as provided in AS

17.38.300

.

A local government may enact ordinances or regulations not in conflict with this chapter or with regulations enacted pursuant to this chapter, governing the time, place, manner, and number of marijuana establishment operations. A local government may establish civil penalties for violation of an ordinance or regulation governing the time, place, and manner of a marijuana establishment that may operate in such local government.

A local government may designate a local regulatory authority that is responsible for processing applications submitted for a registration to operate a marijuana establishment within the boundaries of the local government. The local government may provide that the local regulatory authority may issue such registrations should the issuance by the local government become necessary because of a failure by the board to adopt regulations pursuant to AS

17.38.190

or to accept or process applications in accordance with AS

17.38.200

.

A local government may establish procedures for the issuance, suspension, and revocation of a registration issued by the local government in accordance with (f) of this section. The procedures are subject to all requirements of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

A local government may establish a schedule of annual operating, registration, and application fees for marijuana establishments, provided that the local government may charge the

application fee only if an application is submitted to the local government in accordance with (f) of this section; and

registration fee only if a registration is issued by the local government in accordance with (f) of this section.

If the board does not issue a registration to an applicant within 90 days of receipt of the application filed in accordance with AS

17.38.200

and does not notify the applicant of the specific, permissible reason for its denial, in writing and within such time period, or if the board has adopted regulations pursuant to AS

17.38.190

and has accepted applications pursuant to AS

17.38.200

but has not issued any registrations by 15 months after February 24, 2015, the applicant may resubmit its application directly to the local regulatory authority, pursuant to (c) of this section, and the local regulatory authority may issue an annual registration to the applicant. If an application is submitted to a local regulatory authority under this subsection, the board shall forward to the local regulatory authority the application fee paid by the applicant to the board upon request by the local regulatory authority.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

A local regulatory authority issuing a registration to an applicant shall do so within 90 days of receipt of the submitted or resubmitted application unless the local regulatory authority finds and notifies the applicant that the applicant is not in compliance with ordinances and regulations made pursuant to (b) of this section in effect at the time the application is submitted to the local regulatory authority. The local government shall notify the board if an annual registration has been issued to the applicant.

A registration issued by a local government in accordance with (f) of this section has the same force and effect as a registration issued by the board in accordance with AS

17.38.200

. The holder of a registration described in this subsection is not subject to regulation or enforcement by the board during the term of the registration.

A subsequent or renewed registration may be issued under (f) of this section on an annual basis only upon resubmission to the local government of a new application submitted to the board pursuant to AS

17.38.200

.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

Nothing in this section shall limit such relief as may be available to an aggrieved party under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

Except as provided in AS 29, the exercise of the powers authorized by this section by a borough may be exercised only on a nonareawide basis. In this subsection, "nonareawide" means throughout the area of a borough outside all cities in the borough.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am §§ 2, 3 ch 53 SLA 2016; am §§
65 — 67, 103 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as
AS 17.38.110; renumbered in 2015, at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes, and “February 24, 2015” was substituted for “the effective date of this Act”.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 29, 2016, in (a), added the second sentence; added (m).

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (d), substituted “The procedures are subject” for “or (g) of this section, these procedures shall be” at the beginning of the second sentence, and made a related change; in (e), in the introductory language, inserted “that the local government may charge” near the end, and made a related change, added the (1) and (2) designations, in (e)(1), substituted “application fee only if” for “application fee shall only be due if”, and made a stylistic change, in (e)(2), substituted “registration fee only if” for “a registration fee shall only be due if” and deleted “or (g) of this section” at the end, and made a stylistic change; in (i), in the first sentence, deleted “of this section or” following “with (f)”, and substituted “has the same force” for “shall have the same force”, in the second sentence substituted “a registration described in this section is not subject” for “such registration shall not be subject”, made a stylistic change and repealed (g) and (k).

Editor's notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative's provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.220.
Employers, driving, minors, and control of property.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to require an employer to permit or accommodate the use, consumption, possession, transfer, display, transportation, sale, or growing of marijuana in the workplace or to affect the ability of employers to have policies restricting the use of marijuana by employees.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to allow driving under the influence of marijuana or to supersede laws related to driving under the influence of marijuana.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to permit the transfer of marijuana, with or without remuneration, to a person under the age of 21.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person, employer, school, hospital, recreation or youth center, correction facility, corporation, or any other entity who occupies, owns, or controls private property from prohibiting or otherwise regulating the possession, consumption, use, display, transfer, distribution, sale, transportation, or growing of marijuana on or in that property.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am § 68 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.120; renumbered in 2015.

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), substituted “consumption” for “consumptions” following “the use,”.

Editor's notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.230.
Impact on medical marijuana law.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit any privileges or rights of a medical marijuana patient or medical marijuana caregiver under AS 17.37.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.130; renumbered in 2015.

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.300.
Local option election by an established village.

If a majority of the voters voting on the question vote to approve the option, an established village shall exercise a local option to prohibit the operation of one or more of the following types of marijuana establishments:

marijuana cultivation facilities;

marijuana product manufacturing facilities;

marijuana testing facilities; or

retail marijuana stores.

A ballot question to adopt a local option under this section must at least contain language substantially similar to the following §Shall (name of village) adopt a local option to prohibit (specify local option under (a) of this section)? (yes or no).”

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 53, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on July 29, 2016.

Sec. 17.38.310.
Removal of local option.

If a majority of the voters voting on the question vote to remove the option, an established village shall remove a local option previously adopted under AS

17.38.300

. The option is repealed effective the first day of the month following certification of the results of the election.

A ballot question to remove a local option under this section must at least contain language substantially similar to the following §Shall (name of village) remove the local option currently in effect, that prohibits (current local option under AS

17.38.300(a)

), so that there is no longer any local option in effect? (yes or no).”

When issuing a registration in the area that has removed a local option, the board shall give priority to an applicant who was formerly registered and whose registration was not renewed because of the results of the previous local option election. However, an applicant described in this subsection does not have a legal right to registration, and the board is not required to approve the application.

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 53, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on July 29, 2016.

Sec. 17.38.320.
Effect on registrations of prohibition of marijuana establishments.

If a majority of voters vote to prohibit the operation of marijuana establishments under AS

17.38.300

, the board may not issue, renew, or transfer, between persons or locations, a registration for a marijuana establishment located within the perimeter of the established village. A registration that may not be renewed because of a local option election held under AS

17.38.300

is void 90 days after the results of the election are certified. A registration that expires during the 90 days after the results of a local option election are certified may be extended, until it is void under this section, by payment of a prorated portion of the annual registration fee.

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 53, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on July 29, 2016.

Sec. 17.38.330.
Prohibition of sale and manufacture after election.

If a majority of the voters vote to prohibit the operation of marijuana establishments under AS

17.38.300

, a person may not knowingly sell or manufacture marijuana in the established village.

If there are registered establishments within the established village, the prohibition on sale and manufacture is effective beginning 90 days after the results of the election are certified.

Nothing in this section prohibits the personal conduct authorized in AS

17.38.020

.

A person who violates this section is guilty, upon conviction, of a class A misdemeanor. Each violation is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 53, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on July 29, 2016.

Sec. 17.38.340.
Procedure for local option elections.

An election to adopt a local option under AS

17.38.300

or remove a local option under AS

17.38.310

shall be conducted as required in this section.

Upon receipt of a petition of 35 percent or more of the registered voters residing within an established village, the lieutenant governor shall place on a separate ballot at a special election the local option or removal of local option that constitutes the subject of the petition. The lieutenant governor shall conduct the election under AS 15.

An election under (b) of this section to remove a local option may not be conducted during the first 24 months after the local option was adopted or more than once in a 36-month period.

After a petition has been certified as sufficient to meet the requirements of (b) of this section, another petition may not be filed or certified until after the question presented in the first petition has been voted on. A local option question to prohibit the operation of marijuana cultivation facilities, marijuana product manufacturing facilities, marijuana testing facilities, or retail marijuana stores or to prohibit all marijuana establishments may be presented in one election.

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 53, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on July 29, 2016.

Sec. 17.38.350.
Establishment of perimeter of established village.

Except as provided under (b) and (c) of this section, for purposes of AS

17.38.300

-

17.38.320

, the perimeter of an established village is a circle around the established village that includes an area within a five-mile radius of the post office of the established village. If the established village does not have a post office, the perimeter of an established village is a circle around the established village that includes an area within a five-mile radius of another site selected by the local governing body or by the board if the established village does not have a local governing body.

If the perimeter of an established village determined under (a) of this section includes any area that is within the perimeter of another established village and, if the other established village has

also adopted a local option under AS

17.38.300

, the local option of the established village that is less restrictive applies in the overlapping area;

not adopted a local option under AS

17.38.300

, the local option does not apply in the overlapping area.

If the board determines that the perimeter of an established village as provided under (a) and (b) of this section does not accurately reflect the perimeter of the established village, the board may establish the perimeter of the established village and the areas of overlapping perimeter described under (b) of this section for purposes of applying a local option selected under this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 53, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on July 29, 2016.

Sec. 17.38.360.
Notice of the results of a local option election.

If a majority of the voters vote to adopt or remove a local option under AS

17.38.300

or

17.38.310

, the lieutenant governor shall notify the board of the results of the election immediately after the results are certified. The board shall immediately notify the Department of Law and the Department of Public Safety of the results of the election.

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 53, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on July 29, 2016.

Sec. 17.38.370.
Bail forfeiture for certain offenses.

The supreme court shall establish by rule or order a schedule of bail amounts that may be forfeited without court appearance for a violation of
AS

17.38.030

-

17.38.050

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 53 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 53, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on July 29, 2016.

Sec. 17.38.900.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“board” means the Marijuana Control Board established by AS

17.38.080

;

“consumer” means a person 21 years of age or older who purchases marijuana or marijuana products for personal use by persons 21 years of age or older, but not for resale to others;

“consumption” means the act of ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marijuana into the human body;

“director” means the director of the Marijuana Control Board and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board;

“dwelling” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“established village” means an area that does not contain any part of an incorporated city or another established village and that is an unincorporated community that is in the unorganized borough and that has 25 or more permanent residents;

“local government” means both home rule and general law municipalities, including boroughs and cities of all classes and unified municipalities;

“local regulatory authority” means the office or entity designated to process marijuana establishment applications by a local government;

“manufacture” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

.

“marijuana” means all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or its resin, including marijuana concentrate; “marijuana” does not include fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, sterilized seed of the plant that is incapable of germination, the weight of any other ingredient combined with marijuana to prepare topical or oral administrations, food, drink, or other products, or industrial hemp as defined in AS

03.05.100

;

“marijuana accessories” means any equipment, products, or materials of any kind which are used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, composting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, vaporizing, or containing marijuana, or for ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marijuana into the human body;

“marijuana cultivation facility” means an entity registered to cultivate, prepare, and package marijuana and to sell marijuana to retail marijuana stores, to marijuana product manufacturing facilities, and to other marijuana cultivation facilities, but not to consumers;

“marijuana establishment” means a marijuana cultivation facility, a marijuana testing facility, a marijuana product manufacturing facility, or a retail marijuana store;

“marijuana product manufacturing facility“ means an entity registered to purchase marijuana; manufacture, prepare, and package marijuana products; and sell marijuana and marijuana products to other marijuana product manufacturing facilities and to retail marijuana stores, but not to consumers;

“marijuana products” means concentrated marijuana products and marijuana products that are comprised of marijuana and other ingredients and are intended for use or consumption, such as, but not limited to, edible products, ointments, and tinctures;

“marijuana testing facility” means an entity registered to analyze and certify the safety and potency of marijuana;

“registration” means registration or licensure, as determined by regulation;

“retail marijuana store” means an entity registered to purchase marijuana from marijuana cultivation facilities, to purchase marijuana and marijuana products from marijuana product manufacturing facilities, and to sell marijuana and marijuana products to consumers;

“unreasonably impracticable” means that the measures necessary to comply with the regulations require such a high investment of risk, money, time, or any other resource or asset that the operation of a marijuana establishment is not worthy of being carried out in practice by a reasonably prudent businessperson.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am §§ 5, 6 ch 4 SLA 2015; am § 5 ch 53 SLA 2016; am § 10 ch 5 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (4) was enacted as paragraph (15) and paragraph (17) was enacted as paragraph (16) and renumbered in 2015; paragraphs (5), (6), and (9) were enacted as paragraphs (17) — (19) and renumbered in 2016; at the time these paragraphs were renumbered other paragraphs were also renumbered for alphabetical consistency.

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 5, 2015, in (1), substituted “Marijuana Control Board established by AS

17.38.080

” for “Alcoholic Beverage Control Board established by AS 04.06”; added (15) [now (4)] and (16) [now (17)].

The 2016 amendment, effective July 29, 2016, added (17), (18) and (19).

The 2018 amendment, effective April 12, 2018, in (10), added “, or industrial hemp as defined in AS

03.05.100

” at the end, and made stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”